California statutes. Education Code
(1) Notify students seeking to enroll in the institution, in writing, before the execution of the student’s enrollment agreement, that the institution’s approval to operate a degree program is contingent upon the institution being subsequently accredited.

(2) Within the first two years of the institution’s approval to operate degree programs being deemed provisional, a visiting committee, empaneled by the bureau pursuant to Section 94882, shall review the institution’s documentation of provisional approval and its accreditation plan, and make a recommendation to the bureau regarding the institution’s progress toward achieving full accreditation.

(d) (1) The bureau shall, upon the timely submission of sufficient evidence that an unaccredited institution is making strong progress toward obtaining accreditation, grant an institution’s request for an extension of time, not to exceed five years in total, to meet the requirements of this section.

(2) Evidence submitted to the bureau pursuant to paragraph (1)
 shall include, but is not limited to, an amended accreditation plan adequately identifying why pre-accreditation, accreditation candidacy, or accreditation outlined in the original plan submitted to the bureau was not achieved, active steps the institution is taking to comply with this section, and documentation from an accrediting agency demonstrating the institution’s likely ability to meet the
 requirements of this section.

(3) The bureau may establish policies and procedures to comply with the requirements of this subdivision. Establishment of these policies and procedures are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) Any institution that fails to comply with the requirements of this section by the dates provided shall have its provisional approval to operate degree programs automatically suspended on the applicable date. The bureau shall issue an order suspending the institution’s provisional approval to operate degree programs and that
 suspension shall not be lifted until the institution complies with the requirements of this section or has its accreditation
 reinstated. An institution with a suspended provisional approval to operate degree programs shall not enroll new students in any of its degree programs and shall execute a teach-out plan for its enrolled students.

(f) (1) This section does not prohibit an institution from voluntarily ceasing to pursue accreditation. An institution that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation shall immediately notify the bureau in writing of the institution’s intent to stop offering its degree programs and shall comply with all other applicable laws and regulations. Upon the bureau’s receipt of the notification, the institution’s approval to operate degree programs is deemed voluntarily surrendered.

(2) An institution offering both degree and nondegree programs that
 has its provisional approval to operate degree programs suspended or that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation may continue to offer its nondegree programs and is subject to all other laws and regulations.

(3) An institution that is pursuing accreditation under this section shall not make a change in ownership, change in control, or change in business organization form pursuant to Sections 94893 and 94894 until the institution obtains full accreditation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 5.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94886.

Except as exempted in Article 4 (commencing with Section 94874) or in compliance with the transition provisions in Article 2 (commencing with Section 94802), a person shall not open, conduct, or do business as a private postsecondary educational institution in this state without obtaining an approval to operate under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94887.

An approval to operate shall be granted only after an applicant has presented sufficient evidence to the bureau, and the bureau has independently verified the information provided by the applicant through site visits or other methods deemed appropriate by the bureau, that the applicant has the capacity to satisfy the minimum operating standards. The bureau shall deny an application for an approval to operate if the application does not satisfy those standards. The bureau may deny an application for an approval to operate institutions that would be owned by, have persons in control of, or employ institution managers that had knowledge of, should have known, or knowingly participated in any conduct that was the cause for revocation or unmitigated discipline at another
 institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 6.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94888.

(a) The bureau shall adopt by regulation both of the following:

(1) The process and procedures whereby an institution seeking approval to operate may apply for and obtain an approval to operate.

(2) The process and procedures governing the bureau’s approval and denial of applications for approval to operate, including the process and procedures whereby an applicant for which an application has been denied may appeal that denial.

(b) The bureau shall, by regulation, establish both of the following:

(1) A process for issuing a
 notification of a denial of an approval to operate to an institution that submits an application for approval to operate and for which that application is denied. The notification of denial shall include a statement of reasons for the denial.

(2) Application processing goals and timelines to ensure an institution that has submitted a complete application for approval to operate has that application promptly reviewed for compliance within 30 days of bureau receipt of the application, or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau. The timelines shall ensure that an institution that has submitted a complete and compliant application receives approval within 30 days of the application being deemed compliant by the bureau, or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 21.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94889.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 94890, an approval to operate shall be for a term of five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 8.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94890.

(a) (1) The bureau shall grant an institution that is accredited an approval to operate by means of its accreditation.

(2) The bureau shall adopt by regulation the process and procedures whereby an institution that is accredited may apply for and obtain an approval by means of that accreditation. The bureau shall establish application processing goals and timelines to ensure that an institution that has submitted a complete application for approval to operate by means of its accreditation has that application promptly reviewed for compliance within 30 days of the bureau’s receipt of the application or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau. The timelines shall ensure that an
 institution that has submitted a complete and compliant application receives approval within 30 days of the application being deemed compliant by the bureau, or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau.

(b) The term of an approval to operate pursuant to this section shall be coterminous with the term of accreditation. Upon renewal of the institution’s accreditation, the institution shall submit verification to the bureau, on a form provided by the bureau, that the institution’s accreditation has been renewed.

(c) Institutions that are granted an approval to operate by means of the institution’s accreditation shall comply with all other applicable requirements in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 22.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94891.

(a) The bureau shall adopt by regulation the process and procedures whereby an institution may obtain a renewal of an approval to operate.

(b) To be granted a renewal of an approval to operate, the institution shall demonstrate its continued capacity to meet the minimum operating standards.

(c) (1) An institution that is denied renewal of an approval to operate may file an appeal in accordance with the procedures established by the bureau pursuant to Section 94888.

(2) An institution that has filed an appeal of a denial of a renewal application may continue to operate during
 the appeal process, but must disclose in a written statement, approved by the bureau, to all current and prospective students, that the institution’s application for renewal of approval to operate was denied by the bureau because the bureau determined the application did not satisfy the requirements to operate in California, that the institution is appealing the bureau’s decision, and that the loss of the appeal may result in the institution’s closure.

(3) If the bureau determines that the continued operation of the institution during the appeal process poses a significant risk of harm to students, the bureau shall make an emergency decision pursuant to its authority provided in Section 94938.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 23.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94892.

If an agency of this state other than the bureau or of the federal government provides an approval to offer an educational program and the institution already has a valid approval to operate issued by the bureau, that agency’s educational program approval may satisfy the requirements of this article without any further review by the bureau. The bureau may incorporate that educational program into the institution’s approval to operate when the bureau receives documentation signifying the conferral of the educational program approval by that agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Labor Market Outcome Data Reporting [94892.6. - 94892.6.]

94892.6.

(a) (1) An institution approved to operate by the bureau shall collect and retain all of the following data:

(A) For each graduate completing a program on or after January 1,
 2020:

(i) Individual identifying information for each graduate of the institution sufficient to match to wage data from the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(ii) The program the graduate was enrolled in.

(iii) The graduate’s student loan debt information reported under subdivision (g) of Section 74112 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, if that information applies to the student.

(B) Other information determined by the bureau to be warranted for the purpose of inclusion in the Cradle-to-Career Data System established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) All social security numbers or federal taxpayer identification numbers collected pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be reported by an institution solely for
 the purposes set forth in this section, and shall not be disclosed by an institution to any third party other than the
 bureau, the Employment Development
 Department, and the Cradle-to-Career Data System established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1, unless the disclosure is
 otherwise
 required by law.

(b) (1) An institution shall report information collected pursuant to subdivision (a) to the bureau annually according to a schedule and in a format determined by the bureau. The bureau shall match the data reported by institutions pursuant to this section with wage data from the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) The bureau shall provide the data reported by institutions pursuant to this section to both of the following:

 (A) The Employment Development Department for the purpose of fulfilling federal reporting requirements outlined in Section 116(d)(4)(a) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.

(B) The Cradle-to-Career Data System, as required by Cradle-to-Career Data System data providers pursuant to Section 10871.

(3) The bureau shall make available on its internet website the relevant program-level and institution-level statistics, presented in terms of easily understood labor market measures and consistent with all pertinent state and federal privacy laws, regarding the earnings levels of graduates and the student debt
 information reported under subdivision (g) of Section 74112 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, if that information applies to the student.

(4) Labor market outcome data for each program and institution shall, at a minimum, provide data relating to graduates at two years and at five years after their graduation.

(5) This subdivision shall not be operative until the Director of Consumer Affairs certifies that the bureau’s information technology system has been updated and is capable of processing data as required by this section. The bureau shall notify institutions when this certification has occurred. An institution shall have 120 days from the date it receives notification from the bureau to comply with this section.

(c) When sufficient data is reported and publicly available under this section, it is
 the intent of the Legislature to review the process by which institutions are required to collect and report employment data and reduce duplicative efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 69.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Substantive Changes to an Approval to Operate [94893. - 94896.]

94893.

If an institution intends to make a substantive change to its approval to operate, the institution shall receive prior authorization from the bureau. Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 94896, if the institution makes the substantive change without prior bureau authorization, the institution’s approval to operate may be suspended or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94894.

The following changes to an approval to operate are considered substantive changes and require prior authorization:

(a) A change in educational objectives, including an addition of a new diploma or a degree educational program unrelated to the approved educational programs offered by the institution.

(b) A change in ownership or person in control.

(c) A change in control.

(d) A change in business organization form.

(e) A change of location.

(f) A change of name.

(g) A significant change in the method of instructional delivery.

(h) An addition of a separate branch more than five miles from the main or branch campus.

(i) An increase or decrease of 25 percent or more in the number of clock hours or credit hours required for successful completion of the program.

(j) Participation in federal student financial aid programs authorized by Title IV of the
 federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(k) A change in the academic measurement of an educational program from clock hours to credit hours.

(l) A change in the distance education learning management system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 7.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94895.

The bureau shall, by January 1, 2011, adopt by regulation the process and procedures whereby an institution shall seek authorization for substantive changes to an approval to operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94896.

(a) An institution that has been granted an approval to operate by means of accreditation shall only make a substantive change in accordance with the institution’s accreditation standards.

(b) The institution shall notify the bureau of the substantive change on a form provided by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Fair Business Practices [94897. - 94899.5.]

94897.

An institution shall not do any of the following:

(a) Use, or allow the use of, any reproduction or facsimile of the Great Seal of the State of California on a diploma.

(b) Promise or guarantee employment, or otherwise overstate the availability of jobs upon graduation.

(c) Advertise concerning job availability, degree of skill, or length of time required to learn a trade or skill unless the information is accurate and not misleading.

(d) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, without including the fact that the
 educational programs are delivered by means of distance education if the educational programs are so delivered.

(e) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, that the institution is accredited, unless the institution has been accredited by an accrediting agency.

(f) Solicit students for enrollment by causing an advertisement to be published in “help wanted” columns in a magazine, newspaper, or publication, or use “blind” advertising that fails to identify the institution.

(g) Offer to compensate a student to act as an agent of the institution with regard to the solicitation, referral, or recruitment of any person for enrollment in the institution, except that an institution may award a token gift to a
 student for referring an individual, provided that the gift is not in the form of money, no more than one gift is provided annually to a student, and the gift’s cost is not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(h) Pay any consideration to a person to induce that person to sign an enrollment agreement for an educational program.

(i) Use a name in any manner improperly implying any of the following:

(1) The institution is affiliated with any government agency, public or private corporation, agency, or association if it is not, in fact, thus affiliated.

(2) The institution is a public institution.

(3) The institution grants degrees, if the institution does not grant degrees.

(j) In any manner make an untrue or misleading change in, or untrue or misleading statement related to: a test score, grade or record of grades, attendance record, record indicating student completion, placement, employment, salaries, or financial information; a financial report filed with the bureau; information or records relating to the student’s eligibility for student financial aid at the institution; or any other record or document required by this chapter or by the bureau.

(k) Willfully falsify, destroy, or conceal any document of record while that document of record is required to be maintained by this chapter.

(l) Use the terms “approval,” “approved,” “approval to operate,” or “approved to operate” without stating clearly and conspicuously that approval to operate means compliance with state standards as set forth in this chapter. An institution may not state or imply either of the following:

(1) The institution or its educational programs are endorsed or recommended by the state or by the bureau.

(2) The approval to operate indicates that the institution exceeds minimum state standards as set forth in this chapter.

(m) Direct any individual to do any of the following:

(1) Perform an act that violates this chapter.

(2) Refrain from reporting unlawful conduct to the bureau or another government agency.

(3) Engage in any unfair act to persuade a student not to complain to the bureau or another government agency.

(n) Compensate an employee involved in recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students on the basis of a commission, commission draw, bonus, quota, or other similar method related to the recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students, except as provided in paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) If the educational program is scheduled to be completed in 90 days or less, the institution shall pay compensation related to a
 particular student only if that student completes the educational program.

(2) For institutions participating in the federal student financial aid programs, this subdivision shall not prevent the payment of compensation to those involved in recruitment, admissions, or the award of financial aid if those payments are in conformity with federal regulations governing an institution’s participation in the federal student financial aid programs.

(o) Require a prospective student to provide personal contact information in order to obtain, from the institution’s internet website, educational program information that is required to be contained in the school catalog or any information required pursuant to the consumer information requirements of Title IV of the federal Higher Education
 Act of 1965, and any amendments thereto.

(p) Offer an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree without disclosing to prospective students before enrollment whether the institution or the degree program is unaccredited and any known limitation of the degree, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states.

(2) A statement that reads: “A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.”

(3) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal financial aid programs.

(q) In any manner commit fraud against, or make a material untrue or misleading statement to, a student or prospective student under the institution’s authority or the pretense or appearance of the institution’s authority.

(r) Charge or collect any payment for institutional charges that are not authorized by an executed enrollment agreement.

(s) Violate Section 1788.93 of the Civil Code.

(t) Require a prospective, current, or former student or employee to sign a nondisclosure agreement pertaining
 to their relationship to, or experience with, the institution, except that an institution may use a nondisclosure agreement to protect the institution’s intellectual property and trade secrets. Any nondisclosure agreement in violation of this section is void and not enforceable at law or in equity.

(u) Fail to maintain policies related to compliance with this chapter or adhere to the institution’s stated policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 40.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94898.

(a) An institution shall not merge classes unless all of the students have received the same amount of instruction. This subdivision does not prevent the placement of students, who are enrolled in different educational programs, in the same class if that class is part of each of the educational programs and the placement in a merged class will not impair the students’ learning of the subject matter of the class.

(b) After a student has enrolled in an educational program, the institution shall not do either of the following:

(1) Make any unscheduled suspension of any class unless caused by circumstances beyond the institution’s
 control.

(2) Change the day or time during the period of attendance in which any class is offered to a day when the student is not scheduled to attend the institution or to a time that is outside of the range of time that the student is scheduled to attend the institution on the day for which the change is proposed unless at least 90 percent of the students who are enrolled consent to the change and the institution offers full refunds to the students who do not consent to the change. For the purpose of this paragraph, “range of time” means the period beginning with the time at which the student’s first scheduled class session for the day is set to start and ending with the time the student’s last scheduled class session for that day is set to finish.

(c) If an institution enrolls a student in an educational program that is conducted at a specific site at the time of enrollment,
 the institution shall not convert the educational program to another method of delivery, such as by means of distance education. This subdivision does not apply to an educational program that also includes a distance education component, if the student is notified during the enrollment process, in writing, that the program contains a distance education component.

(d) An institution shall not move the location of class instruction more than 25 miles from the location of instruction at the time of enrollment unless any of the following occur:

(1) The institution discloses in writing to each student before enrollment in the educational program that the location of instruction will change after the educational program begins and the address of the new location.

(2) The institution applies for, and the bureau grants,
 approval to change the location. The bureau shall grant the application within 60 days if the bureau, after notice to affected students and an opportunity for them to be heard as prescribed by the bureau, concludes that the change in location would not be unfair or unduly burdensome to students. The bureau may grant approval to change the location subject to reasonable conditions, such as requiring the institution to provide transportation, transportation costs, or refunds to adversely affected students.

(3) The institution offers a full refund to students enrolled in the educational program who do not voluntarily consent to the change.

(4) An unforeseeable and unavoidable circumstance outside of the control of the institution requires the change in the location of instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94899.

(a) If an institution offers an educational program in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field that requires licensure in this state, the institution shall have an educational program approval from the appropriate state licensing agency to conduct that educational program in order that a student who completes the educational program, except as provided in Section 94905, is eligible to sit for any required licensure examination.

(b) An institution offering an educational program requiring approval from another licensing agency in this
 state that subsequently loses that approval shall have their approval to operate the program automatically suspended by the bureau by operation of law. The institution shall notify the bureau within 10 days of its loss of approval to offer the educational program, and shall cease offering the program within 30 days of the loss of the approval to offer the educational program, or by an earlier date as required by the other state licensing agency. Reinstatement of the approval to operate may be made at any time following the suspension by providing proof satisfactory to the bureau that the license is properly approved and in compliance with all bureau requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 9.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94899.5.

(a) Institutions that offer short-term programs designed to be completed in one term or four months, whichever is less, may require payment of all tuition and fees on the first day of instruction.

(b) For those programs designed to be greater than four months, an institution shall not require more than one term or four months of advance payment of tuition at a time. When 50 percent of the program has been offered, the institution may require full payment.

(c) The limitations in this section shall not apply to any funds received by an institution through federal and state student financial aid grant and loan programs, or
 through any other federal or state programs.

(d) An institution that provides private institutional loan funding to a student shall ensure that the student is not obligated for indebtedness that exceeds the total charges for the current period of attendance.

(e) At the student’s option, an institution may accept payment in full for tuition and fees, including any funds received through institutional loans, after the student has been accepted and enrolled and the date of the first class session is disclosed on the enrollment agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 84.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Recordkeeping [94900. - 94900.7.]

94900.

(a) An institution shall maintain records of the name, address, e-mail address, and telephone number of each student who is enrolled in an educational program in that institution.

(b) An institution shall maintain, for each student granted a degree or certificate by that institution, complete and accurate permanent records of all of the following:

(1) The degree or certificate granted and the date on which that degree or certificate was granted.

(2) The courses and units on which the certificate or degree was based.

(3) The grades earned by the student in each of those courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 41.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94900.5.

An institution shall maintain, for a period of not less than five years, at its principal place of business in this state, complete and accurate records of all of the following information:

(a) The educational programs offered by the institution and the curriculum for each.

(b) The names and addresses of the members of the institution’s faculty and records of the educational qualifications of each member of the faculty.

(c) Any other records required to be maintained by this chapter, including, but not limited to, records maintained pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section
 94928).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94900.7.

The recordkeeping requirements of this article shall not apply to an institution that is accredited, if the recordkeeping requirements of the accrediting organization are substantially similar to the recordkeeping requirements of this article, as determined by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Recruiters [94901. - 94901.]

94901.

(a) An institution’s recruiters shall be employees.

(b) (1) An institution shall issue identification to each recruiter identifying the recruiter and the institution.

(2) The recruiter shall have the issued identification with them while recruiting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 85.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Enrollment Agreements and Disclosures [94902. - 94913.]

94902.

(a) A student shall enroll solely by means of executing an enrollment agreement. The enrollment agreement shall be signed by the student and by an authorized employee of the institution.

(b) An enrollment agreement is not enforceable unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The student has received the institution’s current catalog and School Performance Fact Sheet prior to signing the enrollment agreement.

(2) At the time of the execution of the enrollment agreement, the institution held a valid approval to operate.

(3) Prior to the execution of the enrollment agreement, the student and the institution have signed and dated the information required to be disclosed in the School Performance Fact Sheet pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 94910. Each of these items in the School Performance Fact Sheet shall include a line for the student to initial and shall be initialed and dated by the student.

(c) A student shall receive a copy of the signed enrollment agreement, in writing or electronically, regardless of whether total charges are paid by the student.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 42.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94903.

A student may not waive any term or receipt of any disclosure required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94905.

(a) During the enrollment process, an institution offering educational programs designed to lead to positions in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure in this state shall exercise reasonable care to determine if the student will not be eligible to obtain licensure in the profession, occupation, trade, or career field at the time of the student’s graduation and shall provide all students enrolled in those programs with a written copy of the requirements for licensure established by the state, including any applicable course requirements established by the state.

(1) If the minimum course requirements of the institution exceed the minimum requirements for state licensure, the institution shall disclose this information, including a list
 of those courses that are not required for state licensure.

(2) The institution shall not execute an enrollment agreement with a student that is known to be ineligible for licensure, unless the student’s stated objective is other than licensure.

(b) During the enrollment process, an institution may discuss internships and student jobs available to the student during the student’s attendance at the institution. If the institution discusses internships and student jobs, the institution shall disclose the number of requests for internship and student job placement assistance received by the institution during the immediately preceding calendar year and the number of actual placements during that year.

(c) During the enrollment process, an institution offering educational programs designed to lead to positions in a
 profession, occupation, trade, or career field where voluntary licensure by a government agency is available, shall provide its students seeking to enroll in those programs with a written copy of the requirements for that voluntary licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 97.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94906.

(a) An enrollment agreement shall be written in language that is easily understood. If English is not the student’s primary language, and the student is unable to understand the terms and conditions of the enrollment agreement, the student shall have the right to obtain a clear explanation of the terms and conditions and all cancellation and refund policies in their primary language.

(b) If the recruitment leading to enrollment was conducted in a language other than English, the enrollment agreement, disclosures, and statements shall be in that language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 86.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94907.

An institution shall not require a student to invoke an internal institutional dispute procedure before enforcing any contractual or other legal rights or remedies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 87.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94908.

Any information or statement required by this article to be included in the catalog, School Performance Fact Sheet, or enrollment agreement shall be printed in at least the same size font as the majority of the text in that document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94909.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), before enrollment, an institution shall provide a prospective student, either in writing or electronically, with a current school catalog containing, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and, if applicable, internet website address of the institution.

(2) Except as specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 94802), a statement that the institution is a private institution and that it is approved to operate by the bureau.

(3) The following statements:

(A) “Any questions a student may have regarding this catalog that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).”

(B) “As a prospective student, you are encouraged to review this catalog before signing an enrollment agreement. You are also encouraged to review the School Performance Fact Sheet, which must be provided to you before signing an enrollment agreement.”

(C) “A student or any member of the public may file a complaint about this institution with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by